Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Probation and Parole Law

§ 47-7-1.
Probation and Parole Law.

This chaptershall be known as the “Probation and Parole Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004; Laws, 1944, ch. 334, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 262, § 1; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 90; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 100; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 100, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-7-2.
Definitions.

For purposesof this chapter, the following words shall have the meaning ascribedherein unless the context shall otherwise require:

“Adult”means a person who is seventeen (17) years of age or older, or anyperson convicted of any crime not subject to the provisions of theyouth court law, or any person “certified” to be triedas an adult by any youth court in the state.

“Board”means the State Parole Board.

“Parolecase plan” means an individualized, written accountabilityand behavior change strategy developed by the department in collaborationwith the parole board to prepare offenders for release on parole atthe parole eligibility date. The case plan shall focus on the offender’scriminal risk factors that, if addressed, reduce the likelihood ofreoffending.

“Commissioner”means the Commissioner of Corrections.

“Correctionalsystem” means the facilities, institutions, programs and personnelof the department utilized for adult offenders who are committed tothe custody of the department.

“Criminalrisk factors” means characteristics that increase a person’slikelihood of reoffending. These characteristics include: antisocialbehavior; antisocial personality; criminal thinking; criminal associates;dysfunctional family; low levels of employment or education; pooruse of leisure and recreation; and substance abuse.

“Department”means the Mississippi Department of Corrections.

“Detention”means the temporary care of juveniles and adults who require securecustody for their own or the community’s protection in a physicallyrestricting facility prior to adjudication, or retention in a physicallyrestricting facility upon being taken into custody after an allegedparole or probation violation.

“Dischargeplan” means an individualized written document that providesinformation to support the offender in meeting the basic needs identifiedin the pre-release assessment. This information shall include, butis not limited to: contact names, phone numbers, and addresses ofreferrals and resources.

“Evidence-basedpractices” means supervision policies, procedures, and practicesthat scientific research demonstrates reduce recidivism.

“Facility”or “institution” means any facility for the custody,care, treatment and study of offenders which is under the supervisionand control of the department.

“Juvenile,”“minor” or “youthful” means a person lessthan seventeen (17) years of age.

“Offender”means any person convicted of a crime or offense under the laws andordinances of the state and its political subdivisions.

“Pre-releaseassessment” means a determination of an offender’s abilityto attend to basic needs, including, but not limited to, transportation,clothing and food, financial resources, personal identification documents,housing, employment, education, and health care, following release.

“Specialmeetings” means those meetings called by the chairman withat least twenty-four (24) hours’ notice or a unanimous waiverof notice.

“Supervisionplan” means a plan developed by the community corrections departmentto manage offenders on probation and parole in a way that reducesthe likelihood they will commit a new criminal offense or violatethe terms of supervision and that increases the likelihood of obtainingstable housing, employment and skills necessary to sustain positiveconduct.

“Technicalviolation” means an act or omission by the probationer thatviolates a condition or conditions of probation placed on the probationerby the court or the probation officer.

“Transitionalreentry center” means a state-operated or state-contractedfacility used to house offenders leaving the physical custody of theDepartment of Corrections on parole, probation or post-release supervisionwho are in need of temporary housing and services that reduce theirrisk to reoffend.

“Unitof local government” means a county, city, town, village orother general purpose political subdivision of the state.

“Riskand needs assessment” means the determination of a person’srisk to reoffend using an actuarial assessment tool validated on Mississippicorrections populations and the needs that, when addressed, reducethe risk to reoffend.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 91; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 101; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 101; Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 25, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 47, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-7-3.
Parole of prisoners;
conditions for eligibility; determination of tentative hearing date.

Every prisonerwho has been convicted of any offense against the State of Mississippi,and is confined in the execution of a judgment of such convictionin the Mississippi Department of Corrections for a definite term orterms of one (1) year or over, or for the term of his or her naturallife, whose record of conduct shows that such prisoner has observedthe rules of the department, and who has served not less than one-fourth(1/4) of the total of such term or terms for which such prisoner wassentenced, or, if sentenced to serve a term or terms of thirty (30)years or more, or, if sentenced for the term of the natural life ofsuch prisoner, has served not less than ten (10) years of such lifesentence, may be released on parole as hereinafter provided, exceptthat:

No prisoner convictedas a confirmed and habitual criminal under the provisions of Sections 99-19-81 through 99-19-87 shall be eligiblefor parole;

Any person whoshall have been convicted of a sex crime shall not be released onparole except for a person under the age of nineteen (19) who hasbeen convicted under Section 97-3-67;

No person shallbe eligible for parole who shall, on or after January 1, 1977, beconvicted of robbery or attempted robbery through the display of afirearm until he shall have served ten (10) years if sentenced toa term or terms of more than ten (10) years or if sentenced for theterm of the natural life of such person. If such person is sentencedto a term or terms of ten (10) years or less, then such person shallnot be eligible for parole. The provisions of this paragraph (c)(i)shall also apply to any person who shall commit robbery or attemptedrobbery on or after July 1, 1982, through the display of a deadlyweapon. This paragraph (c)(i) shall not apply to persons convictedafter September 30, 1994;

No person shallbe eligible for parole who shall, on or after October 1, 1994, beconvicted of robbery, attempted robbery or carjacking as providedin Section 97-3-115 et seq.,through the display of a firearm or drive-by shooting as providedin Section 97-3-109. The provisionsof this paragraph (c)(ii) shall also apply to any person who shallcommit robbery, attempted robbery, carjacking or a drive-by shootingon or after October 1, 1994, through the display of a deadly weapon.This paragraph (c)(ii) shall not apply to persons convicted afterJuly 1, 2014;

No person shallbe eligible for parole who, on or after July 1, 1994, is charged,tried, convicted and sentenced to life imprisonment without eligibilityfor parole under the provisions of Section 99-19-101;

No person shallbe eligible for parole who is charged, tried, convicted and sentencedto life imprisonment under the provisions of Section 99-19-101;

No person shallbe eligible for parole who is convicted or whose suspended sentenceis revoked after June 30, 1995, except that an offender convictedof only nonviolent crimes after June 30, 1995, may be eligible forparole if the offender meets the requirements in subsection (1) andthis paragraph. In addition to other requirements, if an offenderis convicted of a drug or driving under the influence felony, theoffender must complete a drug and alcohol rehabilitation program priorto parole or the offender may be required to complete a post-releasedrug and alcohol program as a condition of parole. For purposes ofthis paragraph, “nonviolent crime” means a felony otherthan homicide, robbery, manslaughter, sex crimes, arson, burglaryof an occupied dwelling, aggravated assault, kidnapping, feloniousabuse of vulnerable adults, felonies with enhanced penalties, except enhanced penalties for the crime of possessionof a controlled substance under Section 41-29-147, the sale or manufacture of a controlled substance under the UniformControlled Substances Law, felony child abuse, or exploitation orany crime under Section 97-5-33 or Section 97-5-39(2) or 97-5-39(1)(b), 97-5-39(1)(c) or a violationof Section 63-11-30(5). In addition,an offender incarcerated for committing the crime of possession ofa controlled substance under the Uniform Controlled Substances Lawafter July 1, 1995, including an offenderwho receives an enhanced penalty under the provisions of Section 41-29-147 for suchpossession, shall be eligible for parole. An offenderincarcerated for committing the crime of sale or manufacture of acontrolled substance shall be eligible for parole after serving one-fourth(1/4) of the sentence imposed by the trial court. This paragraph (f)shall not apply to persons convicted on or after July 1, 2014;

1. The inmate issentenced as a habitual offender under Sections 99-19-81 through 99-19-87;

2. The inmate issentenced for a crime of violence under Section 97-3-2;

3. The inmate issentenced for an offense that specifically prohibits parole release;

4. The inmate issentenced for trafficking in controlled substances under Section 41-29-139(f);

5. The inmate issentenced for a sex crime; or

6. The inmate hasnot served one-fourth (1/4) of the sentence imposed by the court.

No person who,on or after July 1, 2014, is convicted of a crime of violence pursuantto Section 97-3-2, a sex crimeor an offense that specifically prohibits parole release, shall beeligible for parole. All persons convicted of any other offense onor after July 1, 2014, are eligible for parole after they have servedone-fourth (1/4) of the sentence or sentences imposed by the trialcourt.

Notwithstandingthe provisions in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (g), a personserving a sentence who has reached the age of sixty (60) or olderand who has served no less than ten (10) years of the sentence orsentences imposed by the trial court shall be eligible for parole.Any person eligible for parole under this subsection shall be requiredto have a parole hearing before the board prior to parole release.No inmate shall be eligible for parole under this paragraph of thissubsection if:

Notwithstandingthe provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection, any offender who has not committed a crimeof violence under Section 97-3-2 and has servedtwenty-five percent (25%) or more of his sentence may be paroled bythe parole board if, after the sentencing judge or if the sentencingjudge is retired, disabled or incapacitated, the senior circuit judgeauthorizes the offender to be eligible for parole consideration;

Notwithstanding any other provision oflaw, an inmate who has not been convicted as a habitual offender under Sections 99-19-81 through 99-19-87, has not been convictedof committing a crime of violence, as defined under Section 97-3-2, has not beenconvicted of a sex crime or any other crime that specifically prohibitsparole release, and has not been convicted of drug trafficking under Section 41-29-139 is eligiblefor parole if the inmate has served twenty-five percent (25%) or moreof his or her sentence, but is otherwise ineligible for parole.

Notwithstandingany other provision of law, an inmate shall not be eligible to receiveearned time, good time or any other administrative reduction of timewhich shall reduce the time necessary to be served for parole eligibilityas provided in subsection (1) of this section.

The State ParoleBoard shall, by rules and regulations, establish a method of determininga tentative parole hearing date for each eligible offender taken intothe custody of the Department of Corrections. The tentative parolehearing date shall be determined within ninety (90) days after thedepartment has assumed custody of the offender. The parole hearingdate shall occur when the offender is within thirty (30) days of themonth of his parole eligibility date. The parole eligibility dateshall not be earlier than one-fourth (1/4) of the prison sentenceor sentences imposed by the court.

Any inmate withintwenty-four (24) months of his parole eligibility date and who meetsthe criteria established by the classification board shall receivepriority for placement in any educational development and job trainingprograms that are part of his or her parole case plan. Any inmaterefusing to participate in an educational development or job trainingprogram that is part of the case plan may be in jeopardy of noncompliancewith the case plan and may be denied parole.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-03; Laws, 1944, ch. 334, § 2; Laws, 1946, ch. 486, § 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 4; Laws, 1958, ch. 233, § 2; Laws, 1964, ch. 366; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 79; Laws, 1976, ch. 470, § 5; Laws, 1980, ch. 511; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 92; Laws, 1982, ch. 431, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 102; Laws, 1985, ch. 499, § 16; Laws, 1985, ch. 531, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 102; Laws, 1986, ch. 435, § 1; Laws, 1989, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 3, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 443, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 566, § 2; Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 25, § 5; Laws, 1995, ch. 575, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 596, § 3; Laws, 2001, ch. 393, § 11; Laws, 2002, ch. 413, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 407, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 520, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 569, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 503, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 438, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 536, § 4; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 40; Laws, 2015, ch. 448, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 506, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 13, 2016); Laws, 2018, ch. 416, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 47-7-3.1.
Case plan for
parole-eligible inmates; purpose; components.

In consultationwith the Parole Board, the department shall develop a case plan forall parole eligible inmates to guide an inmate’s rehabilitationwhile in the department’s custody and to reduce the likelihoodof recidivism after release.

Within ninety(90) days of admission, the department shall complete a case planon all inmates which shall include, but not limited to:

Programming andtreatment requirements based on the results of a risk and needs assessment;

Any programmingor treatment requirements contained in the sentencing order; and

General behaviorrequirements in accordance with the rules and policies of the department.

The departmentshall provide the inmate with a written copy of the case plan andthe inmate’s caseworker shall explain the conditions set forthin the case plan.

Within ninety(90) days of admission, the caseworker shall notify the inmate oftheir parole eligibility date as calculated in accordance with Section 47-7-3(3);

At the time aparole-eligible inmate receives the case plan, the department shallsend the case plan to the Parole Board for approval.

The departmentshall ensure that the case plan is achievable prior to inmate’sparole eligibility date.

The caseworkershall meet with the inmate every eight (8) weeks from the date theoffender received the case plan to review the inmate’s caseplan progress.

Every four (4)months the department shall electronically submit a progress reporton each parole-eligible inmate’s case plan to the Parole Board.The board may meet to review an inmate’s case plan and mayprovide written input to the caseworker on the inmate’s progresstoward completion of the case plan.

The Parole Boardshall provide semiannually to the Oversight Task Force the numberof parole hearings held, the number of prisoners released to parolewithout a hearing and the number of parolees released after a hearing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 43, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-7-3.2.
Minimum time
offenders convicted of crime of violence must serve before release;
minimum percentage of other sentences offenders must serve before
release.

Notwithstanding Sections 47-5-138, 47-5-139, 47-5-138.1 or 47-5-142, no person convictedof a criminal offense on or after July 1, 2014, shall be releasedby the department until he or she has served no less than fifty percent(50%) of a sentence for a crime of violence pursuant to Section 97-3-2 or twenty-fivepercent (25%) of any other sentence imposed by the court.

This sectionshall not apply to:

Offenders sentencedto life imprisonment;

Offenders convictedas habitual offenders pursuant to Sections 99-19-81 through 99-19-87;

Offenders servinga sentence for a sex offense; or

Offenders servinga sentence for trafficking pursuant to Section 41-29-139(f).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-7-4.
Conditional medical
release of prisoners; criteria; supervision; revocation.

The commissionerand the medical director of the department may place an offender whohas served not less than one (1) year of his or her sentence, exceptan offender convicted of a sex crime, on conditional medical release.However, a nonviolent offender who is bedridden may be placed on conditionalmedical release regardless of the time served on his or her sentence.Upon the release of a nonviolent offender who is bedridden, the stateshall not be responsible or liable for any medical costs that maybe incurred if such costs are acquired after the offender is no longerincarcerated due to his or her placement on conditional medical release.The commissioner shall not place an offender on conditional medicalrelease unless the medical director of the department certifies tothe commissioner that (a) the offender is suffering from a significantpermanent physical medical condition with no possibility of recovery;(b) that his or her further incarceration will serve no rehabilitativepurposes; and (c) that the state would incur unreasonable expensesas a result of his or her continued incarceration. Any offender placedon conditional medical release shall be supervised by the Divisionof Community Corrections of the department for the remainder of hisor her sentence. An offender’s conditional medical releasemay be revoked and the offender returned and placed in actual custodyof the department if the offender violates an order or condition ofhis or her conditional medical release. An offender who is no longerbedridden shall be returned and placed in the actual custody of thedepartment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 426, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 365, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 545, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 2012.).

§ 47-7-5.
State Parole Board created; membership;
requirements; vacancies; expenses; immunity; budget; responsibilities
to offenders; electronic monitoring program; central registry of paroled
inmates; minimum vote required to grant parole to inmate convicted
of capital murder or sex crime [Repealed effective July 1, 2022].

The State ParoleBoard, created under former Section 47-7-5, is herebycreated, continued and reconstituted and shall be composed of five(5) members. The Governor shall appoint the members with the adviceand consent of the Senate. All terms shall be at the will and pleasureof the Governor. Any vacancy shall be filled by the Governor, withthe advice and consent of the Senate. The Governor shall appoint achairman of the board.

Any person whois appointed to serve on the board shall possess at least a bachelor’sdegree or a high school diploma and four (4) years’ work experience.Each member shall devote his full time to the duties of his officeand shall not engage in any other business or profession or hold anyother public office. A member shall not receive compensation or perdiem in addition to his salary as prohibited under Section 25-3-38. Each membershall keep such hours and workdays as required of full-time stateemployees under Section 25-1-98. Individualsshall be appointed to serve on the board without reference to theirpolitical affiliations. Each board member, including the chairman,may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses as authorizedby Section 25-3-41. Each memberof the board shall complete annual training developed based on guidancefrom the National Institute of Corrections, the Association of ParolingAuthorities International, or the American Probation and Parole Association.Each first-time appointee of the board shall, within sixty (60) daysof appointment, or as soon as practical, complete training for first-timeParole Board members developed in consideration of information fromthe National Institute of Corrections, the Association of ParolingAuthorities International, or the American Probation and Parole Association.

The board shallhave exclusive responsibility for the granting of parole as providedby Sections 47-7-3 and 47-7-17 and shall have exclusiveauthority for revocation of the same. The board shall have exclusiveresponsibility for investigating clemency recommendations upon requestof the Governor.

The board, itsmembers and staff, shall be immune from civil liability for any officialacts taken in good faith and in exercise of the board’s legitimategovernmental authority.

The budget ofthe board shall be funded through a separate line item within thegeneral appropriation bill for the support and maintenance of thedepartment. Employees of the department which are employed by or assignedto the board shall work under the guidance and supervision of theboard. There shall be an executive secretary to the board who shallbe responsible for all administrative and general accounting dutiesrelated to the board. The executive secretary shall keep and preserveall records and papers pertaining to the board.

The board shallhave no authority or responsibility for supervision of offenders granteda release for any reason, including, but not limited to, probation,parole or executive clemency or other offenders requiring the samethrough interstate compact agreements. The supervision shall be providedexclusively by the staff of the Division of Community Correctionsof the department.

The Parole Boardis authorized to select and place offenders in an electronic monitoringprogram under the conditions and criteria imposed by the Parole Board.The conditions, restrictions and requirements of Section 47-7-17 and Sections 47-5-1001 through 47-5-1015 shall apply tothe Parole Board and any offender placed in an electronic monitoringprogram by the Parole Board.

Any offenderplaced in an electronic monitoring program under this subsection shallpay the program fee provided in Section 47-5-1013. The programfees shall be deposited in the special fund created in Section 47-5-1007.

The departmentshall have absolute immunity from liability for any injury resultingfrom a determination by the Parole Board that an offender be placedin an electronic monitoring program.

The Parole Boardshall maintain a central registry of paroled inmates. The Parole Boardshall place the following information on the registry: name, address,photograph, crime for which paroled, the date of the end of paroleor flat-time date and other information deemed necessary. The ParoleBoard shall immediately remove information on a parolee at the endof his parole or flat-time date.

When a personis placed on parole, the Parole Board shall inform the parolee ofthe duty to report to the parole officer any change in address ten(10) days before changing address.

The Parole Boardshall utilize an Internet website or other electronic means to releaseor publish the information.

Records maintainedon the registry shall be open to law enforcement agencies and thepublic and shall be available no later than July 1, 2003.

An affirmativevote of at least four (4) members of the Parole Board shall be requiredto grant parole to an inmate convicted of capital murder or a sexcrime.

This sectionshall stand repealed on July 1, 2022.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-01; Laws, 1942, ch. 283; Laws, 1944, ch. 334, § 3; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, §§ 2, 3; Laws, 1956, ch. 262, § 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 272; Laws, 1968, ch. 362, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 80; Laws, 1978, ch. 520, § 13; Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 21; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 93; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 103; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 103; Laws, 1989, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 3, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 346, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 575, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 25, § 1; amended, Laws, 1995, ch. 596, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 602, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 612, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 560, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 569, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 485, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 570, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 597, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 513, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 320, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 52, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2018, ch. 326, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2018, ch. 410, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 47-7-6.
Parole Board to collect
certain information and report semiannually to Oversight Task Force.

The Parole Board,with the assistance of the Department of Corrections, shall collectthe following information:

The number ofoffenders supervised on parole;

The number ofoffenders released on parole;

The number ofparole hearings held;

The parole grantrate for parolees released with and without a hearing;

The average lengthof time offenders spend on parole;

The number andpercentage of parolees revoked for a technical violation and returnedfor a term of imprisonment in a technical violation center;

The number andpercentage of parolees revoked for a technical violation and returnedfor a term of imprisonment in another type of Department of Corrections’facility;

The number andpercentage of parolees who are convicted of a new offense and returnedfor a term of imprisonment on their current crime as well as the newcrime;

The number ofparolees held on a violation in county jail awaiting a revocationhearing; and

The average lengthof stay in a county jail for parolees awaiting a revocation hearing.

The Parole Boardshall semiannually report information required in subsection (1) tothe Oversight Task Force, and upon request, shall report such informationto the PEER Committee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 67, effective from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-7-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 922, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1944, ch. 334, § 12; Laws, 1950, ch. 524; § 6; Laws, 1956, ch. 262, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 239; Laws, 1960, ch. 274; Laws, 1964, ch. 367; Laws, 1968, ch. 363, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 377, § 1]

§ 47-7-9.
General powers and
duties of personnel of Division of Community Corrections as field
supervisors and presentence investigators.

The circuit judgesand county judges in the districts to which Division of CommunityCorrections personnel have been assigned shall have the power to requestof the department transfer or removal of the division personnel fromtheir court.

Division personnelshall investigate all cases referred to them for investigation bythe board, the division or by any court in which they are authorizedto serve. They shall furnish to each person released under their supervisiona written statement of the conditions of probation, parole, earned-releasesupervision, post-release supervision or suspension and shall instructthe person regarding the same. They shall administer a risk and needsassessment on each person under their supervision to measure criminalrisk factors and individual needs. They shall use the results of therisk and needs assessment to guide supervision responses consistentwith evidence-based practices as to the level of supervision and thepractices used to reduce recidivism. They shall develop a supervisionplan for each person assessed as moderate to high risk to reoffend.They shall keep informed concerning the conduct and conditions ofpersons under their supervision and use all suitable methods thatare consistent with evidence-based practices to aid and encouragethem and to bring about improvements in their conduct and conditionand to reduce the risk of recidivism. They shall keep detailed recordsof their work and shall make such reports in writing as the courtor the board may require.

Division personnelshall complete annual training on evidence-based practices and criminalrisk factors, as well as instructions on how to target these factorsto reduce recidivism.

The divisionpersonnel duly assigned to court districts are hereby vested withall the powers of police officers or sheriffs to make arrests or performany other duties required of policemen or sheriffs which may be incidentto the division personnel responsibilities. All probation and paroleofficers hired on or after July 1, 1994, will be placed in the LawEnforcement Officers Training Program and will be required to meetthe standards outlined by that program.

It is the intentionof the Legislature that insofar as practicable the case load of eachdivision personnel supervising offenders in the community (hereinafterfield supervisor) shall not exceed the number of cases that may beadequately handled.

Division personnelshall be provided to perform investigation for the court as providedin this subsection. Division personnel shall conduct presentence investigationson all persons convicted of a felony in any circuit court of the state,prior to sentencing and at the request of the circuit court judgeof the court of conviction. The presentence evaluation report shallconsist of a complete record of the offender’s criminal history,educational level, employment history, psychological condition andsuch other information as the department or judge may deem necessary.Division personnel shall also prepare written victim impact statementsat the request of the sentencing judge as provided in Section 99-19-157.

In order thatoffenders in the custody of the department on July 1, 1976, may benefitfrom the kind of evaluations authorized in this section, an evaluationreport to consist of the information required hereinabove, supplementedby an examination of an offender’s record while in custody,shall be compiled by the division upon all offenders in the custodyof the department on July 1, 1976. After a study of such reports bythe State Parole Board those cases which the board believes wouldmerit some type of executive clemency shall be submitted by the boardto the Governor with its recommendation for the appropriate executiveaction.

The departmentis authorized to accept gifts, grants and subsidies to conduct thisactivity.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-09; Laws, 1944, ch. 334, § 7; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 10; Laws, 1954, Ex. ch. 23, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 262, § 4; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 81; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 94; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 104; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 104; Laws, 1987, ch. 433, § 7; Laws, 1994, ch. 516, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 596, § 6; Laws, 2002, ch. 624, § 5; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 53, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-7-11.
Salaries, per diem
and expenses.

All salariesand expenses incurred in the carrying out of this chapter shall bepaid out of funds appropriated by the legislature for the supportand maintenance of the probation and parole board. All accounts, includingsalaries, shall be approved and allowed by the board, and the boardshall keep a complete record thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-19; Laws, 1944, ch. 334, § 16; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 20; Laws, 1956, ch. 262, § 9; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 95; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 105; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 105, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-7-13.
Voting and recordkeeping
requirements; offices, equipment, and supplies.

A majority ofthe board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business.A decision to parole an offender convicted of murder or a sex-relatedcrime shall require the affirmative vote of three (3) members. Theboard shall maintain, in minute book form, a copy of each of its officialactions with the reasons therefor. Suitable and sufficient officespace and support resources and staff necessary to conducting ParoleBoard business shall be provided by the Department of Corrections.However, the principal place for conducting parole hearings shallbe the state penitentiary at Parchman.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-06; Laws, 1942, ch. 283; Laws, 1944, ch. 334, § 4; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 7; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 96; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 106; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 106; Laws, 1986, ch. 435, § 2; Laws, 1989, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 3, § 5, eff from and after May 1, 1989.

§ 47-7-15.
Seal of board;
records and reports.

The board shalladopt an official seal of which the courts shall take judicial notice.Decisions of the board shall be made by majority vote.

The board shallkeep a record of its acts and shall notify each institution of itsdecisions relating to the persons who are or have been confined therein.At the close of each fiscal year the board shall submit to the Governorand to the Legislature a report with statistical and other data ofits work.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-07; Laws, 1942, ch. 283; Laws, 1944, ch. 334, §§ 5, 18; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 8; brought forward, 1981, ch. 465, § 97; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 107; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 107; Laws, 1989, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 3, § 6, eff from and after May 1, 1989.

§ 47-7-17.
Examination of
offender’s record; eligibility for parole.

Within one (1)year after his admission and at such intervals thereafter as it maydetermine, the board shall secure and consider all pertinent informationregarding each offender, except any under sentence of death or otherwiseineligible for parole, including the circumstances of his offense,his previous social history, his previous criminal record, includingany records of law enforcement agencies or of a youth court regardingthat offender’s juvenile criminal history, his conduct, employmentand attitude while in the custody of the department, the case plancreated to prepare the offender for parole, and the reports of suchphysical and mental examinations as have been made. The board shallfurnish at least three (3) months’ written notice to each suchoffender of the date on which he is eligible for parole.

Before rulingon the application for parole of any offender, the board may requirea parole-eligible offender to have a hearing as required in this chapterbefore the board and to be interviewed. The hearing shall be heldno later than thirty (30) days prior to the month of eligibility.No application for parole of a person convicted of a capital offenseshall be considered by the board unless and until notice of the filingof such application shall have been published at least once a weekfor two (2) weeks in a newspaper published in or having general circulationin the county in which the crime was committed.The board shall,within thirty (30) days prior to the scheduled hearing, also givenotice of the filing of the application for parole to the victim ofthe offense for which the prisoner is incarcerated and being consideredfor parole or, in case the offense be homicide, a designee of theimmediate family of the victim, provided the victim or designatedfamily member has furnished in writing a current address to the boardfor such purpose. Parole release shall, at the hearing, be orderedonly for the best interest of society, not as an award of clemency;it shall not be considered to be a reduction of sentence or pardon. An offender shall be placed on parole only when arrangements havebeen made for his proper employment or for his maintenance and care,and when the board believes that he is able and willing to fulfillthe obligations of a law-abiding citizen.When the board determinesthat the offender will need transitional housing upon release in orderto improve the likelihood of him or her becoming a law-abiding citizen,the board may parole the offender with the condition that the inmatespends no more than six (6) months in a transitional reentry center.At least fifteen (15) days prior to the release of an offender onparole, the director of records of the department shall give the writtennotice which is required pursuant to Section 47-5-177.Everyoffender while on parole shall remain in the legal custody of thedepartment from which he was released and shall be amenable to theorders of the board. Upon determination by the board that an offenderis eligible for release by parole, notice shall also be given withinat least fifteen (15) days before release, by the board to the victimof the offense or the victim’s family member, as indicatedabove, regarding the date when the offender’s release shalloccur, provided a current address of the victim or the victim’sfamily member has been furnished in writing to the board for suchpurpose.

Failure to providenotice to the victim or the victim’s family member of the filingof the application for parole or of any decision made by the boardregarding parole shall not constitute grounds for vacating an otherwiselawful parole determination nor shall it create any right or liability,civilly or criminally, against the board or any member thereof.

A letter of protestagainst granting an offender parole shall not be treated as the conclusiveand only reason for not granting parole.

The board mayadopt such other rules not inconsistent with law as it may deem properor necessary with respect to the eligibility of offenders for parole,the conduct of parole hearings, or conditions to be imposed upon parolees,including a condition that the parolee submit, as provided in Section 47-5-601 to any typeof breath, saliva or urine chemical analysis test, the purpose ofwhich is to detect the possible presence of alcohol or a substanceprohibited or controlled by any law of the State of Mississippi orthe United States. The board shall have the authority to adopt rulesrelated to the placement of certain offenders on unsupervised paroleand for the operation of transitional reentry centers. However, inno case shall an offender be placed on unsupervised parole beforehe has served a minimum of fifty percent (50%) of the period of supervisedparole.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-08; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 9; Laws, 1972, ch. 335, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 8; Laws, 1981, ch. 382, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 98; Laws, 1983, ch. 375, § 2, ch. 435, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 108; Laws, 1985, ch. 444, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 108; Laws, 1986, ch. 422, § 3; Laws, 1986, ch. 424, § 1; Laws, 1989, 1st Ex Sess ch. 3, § 7; Laws, 1990, ch. 399, § 2; Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 25, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 45, eff from and after July 1, 2014.